turku-src/stems/verbs.lexc
! The tested stemtypes
LEXICON Verbs
    StemV1 ;
    StemV1-CV ;
    StemV1-j ;
    StemV1-Polysyll ;
    StemV1-nl ;
    StemV1-nlPolysyll ;
    StemV1-k_0 ;
    StemV1-nch_ch ;
    StemV1-t_0 ;
    StemV1-z_ch ;
    StemV2 ; 
    StemV2-j(V) ;
    StemV2-(C)V ;

! The experimantal stemtypes 


LEXICON Verbs_alustavasti
    Vem ;
    Vam ;
    Vam-polysyll ;
    Vam-n/l ;
    Vam-n/l-polysyll ;
    k-0 ;
    nC-C ;
    t-0 ;
    z-C ;


! The tested stems

LEXICON StemV1 
пураш:пур V1 ;
йодаш:йод V1 ;
ужаш:уж V1 ;
лудаш:луд V1 ;
куржаш:курж V1 ;
кӱраш:кӱр V1 ;
шупшаш:шупш V1 ;
ӱжаш:ӱж V1 ;
кошташ:кошт V1 ;
кодаш:код V1 ;
мушкаш:мушк V1 ;
керташ:керт V1 ;
ужаш:уж V1 ;
почаш:поч V1 ;

LEXICON StemV1-CV  !These verbs are completely regular. In the 3rd person orthography
                                  !requires the эш instead of еш. A whole suffix series has been
                                  !created for this (V1x-Pres-e).
муаш:му V1-CV ;
шуаш:шу V1-CV ;
пуаш:пу V1-CV ;

LEXICON StemV1-j  !These verbs are completely regular. The variants are motivated by
                               !the orthography: /j/ is expressed either by j or ja (in the latter case
                               !j and the following a are merged.
шӱйаш:шӱ V1-(j) ;
шӱйаш:шӱй V1-j ;
лийаш:ли V1-(j) ;
лийаш:лий V1-j ;

LEXICON StemV1-Polysyll 
ошемаш:ошем V1-Polysyll ;
кораҥаш:кораҥ V1-Polysyll ;
колышташ:колышт V1-Polysyll ;
тунемаш:тунем V1-Polysyll ;
почылташ:почылт V1-Polysyll ;
шогылташ:шогылт V1-Polysyll ; !olla, lorvia

LEXICON StemV1-nl 
келаш:кел V1-nl ;
толаш:тол V1-nl ;
колаш:кол V1-nl ;
налаш:нал V1-nl ;

LEXICON StemV1-nlPolysyll 
тӱҥал V1-nlPolysyll ;
тӧрштыл V1-nlPolysyll  ;
ончал V1-nlPolysyll ;
курал V1-nlPolysyll ; !Kyntää

LEXICON StemV1-k_0 
кушк:куш V1-InitC ;
кушк V1-InitV ;
мушк:муш V1-InitC ;
мушк V1-InitV ;
пӱчк:пӱч V1-InitC ;
пӱчк V1-InitV ;

LEXICON StemV1-nch_ch 
шинч:шич V1-InitC ;
шинч V1-InitV ;
шӱгынч:шӱгыч V1-InitC ; !kuoria, särkeä (pähkin.)
шӱгынч V1-InitV ;

LEXICON StemV1-t_0 
лект:лек V1-InitC ;
лект V1-InitV ;
лукт:лук V1-InitC ;
лукт V1-InitV ;

LEXICON StemV1-z_ch
воз:воч V1-InitC ;
воз V1-InitV ;

LEXICON StemV2  
шул^E V2 ;
йог^E V2 ;
кол^E V2 ;
пур^E V2 ;
пышт^E V2 ;
ург^E V2 ;
воз^E V2 ;
лӱҥг^E V2 ; !heilua, keinua
йӧрат^E V2 ;
мошт^E V2 ;
ру^E V2 ; !Does this analyse correctly
шог^E V2 ;  
ньыкт^E V2 ;  !nylkeä
кеч^E V2 ;  !riippua
онч^E V2 ;  
шон^E V2 ;  
ойл^E V2 ;  
кудалт^E V2 ;  
ойырл^E V2 ;  
сеҥ^E V2 ;  
ышт^E V2 ;
вол^E V2 ;

!This type divided into three continuation class types. The first is motivated by 
!orthography (otherwise only -j and -jY types would be needed). The second is
!the exceptional consonant stem type. The third is needed for the suffixes begin-
!ning with a consonant (most of these do not trigger the epenthesis rule; the final
!vowel of the stem of the 2. conj. is not an epenthetic vowel. In some forms, e.g.
!ImpPl3, the difference between cons. and vow. stems is lost; in these cases
!the model produces two overtly identical analyses, e.g. ka^E+V2+Imp+Pl3.
LEXICON StemV2-j(V)  !Ks. AA85, 105-06 alav.
ка^E V2-je ;  !The ^E morphophoneme seems here odd, but the vowel 
                       !harmony rules produce the right result by inserting e.
                    !Other alternative: stem ka (for presens etc.) and stem kae
                    !for CoNeg and Imp. The present solution is simpler.
ка^E:кай V2-j ;
ка^E:кайы V2-jy ;
ми^E V2-je ;  
ми^E:мий V2-j ;
ми^E:мийы V2-jy ;
лӱ^E V2-je ;  
лӱ^E:лӱй V2-j ;  
лӱ^E:лӱйы V2-jy ;  
чи^E V2-je ;  
чи^E:чий V2-j ;
чи^E:чийы V2-jy ;

LEXICON StemV2-(C)V
ку V2-(C)V ; !'kutoa'; 
ку:ку^E V2-(C)V^E ; !'kutoa'; 
шу V2-(C)V ; 
шу:шу^E V2-(C)V^E ; 
пу V2-(C)V ; 
пу:пу^E V2-(C)V^E ; 



! The experimental stems



 
LEXICON Vam-n/l
вел:вел   Vam-n/l ;  ! "putoilla; läikkyä; virrata Vam" 
кел:кел   Vam-n/l ;  ! "kahlata; tallata Vam" 
керл:керл   Vam-n/l ;  ! "(kerlaS) $v1" 
кол:кол   Vam-n/l ;  ! "kuulla Vam" 
кул:кул   Vam-n/l ;  ! "olla tarpeen Vam" 
кул:кул   Vam-n/l ;  ! "täytyy (yksip.) Vam" 
курл:курл   Vam-n/l ;  ! "irrota; revetä; katketa Vam" 
курл:курл   Vam-n/l ;  ! "repäistä; katkaista Vam" 
лул:лул   Vam-n/l ;  ! "(lylaS) $v1" 
ман:ман   Vam-n/l ;  ! "sanoa Vam" 
нал:нал   Vam-n/l ;  ! "ottaa; ostaa Vam" 
нел:нел   Vam-n/l ;  ! "niellä Vam" 
пел:пел   Vam-n/l ;  ! "(ruoka) palaa Vam" 
пурл:пурл   Vam-n/l ;  ! "purra, puraista; haukata Vam" 
тап-тол:тап-тол   Vam-n/l ;  ! "(tap-tolaS) $v1" 
-тол:-тол   Vam-n/l ;  ! "olla kanssakäymisessä Vem-Vam" 
тол:тол   Vam-n/l ;  ! "tulla Vam" 
тура-тол:тура-тол   Vam-n/l ;  ! "(tura-tolaS) $v1" 
ул:ул   Vam-n/l ;  ! "olla Vam" 
упшал:упшал   Vam-n/l ;  ! "pukea lakki/hattu (itselle) Vam" 
шел:шел   Vam-n/l ;  ! "pieniä, halkaista; jakaa Vam" 
шел:шел   Vam-n/l ;  ! "pilkkoutua, haljeta Vam" 
шол:шол   Vam-n/l ;  ! "kiehua, kihista Vam" 
шул:шул   Vam-n/l ;  ! "leikata Vam" 
шыл:шыл   Vam-n/l ;  ! "piiloutua, piileksiä, paeta Vam" 

 
 
LEXICON k-0 
коч:коч   k-0 ;  ! "(koCka˙S) $v1" 
коч:коч   k-0 ;  ! "syödä; kirveltää Vam" 
куш:куш   k-0 ;  ! "(kuSka˙S) $v1" 
куш:куш   k-0 ;  ! "kasvaa Vam" 
муш:муш   k-0 ;  ! "(muSka˙S) $v1" 
муш:муш   k-0 ;  ! "pestä Vam" 
нуш:нуш   k-0 ;  ! "(nuSka˙S) $v1" 
нуш:нуш   k-0 ;  ! "ryömiä, madella Vam" 
пуч:пуч   k-0 ;  ! "(pyCka˙S) $v1" 
пуч:пуч   k-0 ;  ! "leikata Vam" 
шочын-куш:шочын-куш   k-0 ;  ! "(So˙CYn-kuSka˙S) $v1" 
шуш:шуш   k-0 ;  ! "(SySka˙S) $v1" 
шуш:шуш   k-0 ;  ! "sulloa; tukkia; ladata; kirnuta Vam" 

 
 
LEXICON nC-C 
вичкы:вичкы   nC-C ;  ! "(viCkYnCa˙S) $v1" 
вичкы:вичкы   nC-C ;  ! "venytellä Vam" 
йугы:йугы   nC-C ;  ! "(jygYnCa˙S) $v1" 
кӧргы:кӧргы   nC-C ;  ! "(kOrgYnCa˙S) $v1" 
кӧргы:кӧргы   nC-C ;  ! "kovertaa; kaivaa Vam" 
локши:локши   nC-C ;  ! "(lokSinCa˙S) $v1" 
локши:локши   nC-C ;  ! "veistää Vam" 
пушкы:пушкы   nC-C ;  ! "(puSkYnCa˙S) $v1" 
пушкы:пушкы   nC-C ;  ! "pistää, panna Vam" 
пукшы:пукшы   nC-C ;  ! "(pykSYnCa˙S) $v1" 
пучкы:пучкы   nC-C ;  ! "(pyCkYnCa˙S) $v1" 
пушкы:пушкы   nC-C ;  ! "(pySkYnCa˙S) $v1" 
пушкы:пушкы   nC-C ;  ! "ommella Vam" 
турвы:турвы   nC-C ;  ! "(tyrvYnCa˙S) $v1" 
турвы:турвы   nC-C ;  ! "aivastaa Vam" 
укши:укши   nC-C ;  ! "(ukSinCa˙S) $v1" 
укши:укши   nC-C ;  ! "repiä, kiskoa Vam" 
упшы:упшы   nC-C ;  ! "(upSYnCa˙S) $v1" 
угы:угы   nC-C ;  ! "(ygYnCa˙S) $v1" 
угы:угы   nC-C ;  ! "nikotella Vam" 
упшы:упшы   nC-C ;  ! "(ypSYnCa˙S) $v1" 
упшы:упшы   nC-C ;  ! "haistaa, nuuhkia Vam" 
ши:ши   nC-C ;  ! "(SinCa˙S) $v1" 
ши:ши   nC-C ;  ! "istuutua; ryhtyä Vam" 
шугы:шугы   nC-C ;  ! "(SygYnCa˙S) $v1" 
шугы:шугы   nC-C ;  ! "kuoria, nakertaa, särkeä (pähkinöitä yms.) Vam" 

 

 
LEXICON t-0 
лек:лек   t-0 ;  ! "(lekta˙S) $v1" 
лек:лек   t-0 ;  ! "lähteä, mennä; tulla esiin; saada alkunsa Vam" 
лук:лук   t-0 ;  ! "(lukta˙S) $v1" 
лук:лук   t-0 ;  ! "viedä, poistaa; ottaa (esiin); julkaista Vam" 
ньык:ньык   t-0 ;  ! "(n<Ykta˙S) $v1" 
ньык:ньык   t-0 ;  ! "nylkeä Vam" 
шок:шок   t-0 ;  ! "(Sokta˙S) $v1" 
шок:шок   t-0 ;  ! "seuloa Vam" 
шук:шук   t-0 ;  ! "(SyktaS) $v1" 

 

 
LEXICON z-C 
во:во   z-C ;  ! "käydä pitkäkseen; laskeutua Vam" 
камво:камво   z-C ;  ! "(kamvoza˙S) $v1" 
камво:камво   z-C ;  ! "pudota, kaatua Vam" 
